es: Material de oficina > Clasificación y organización > Materiales de encuadernación > Encuadernadoras: Máquinas de encuadernación eléctricas; Encuadernadoras manuales
pl: Artykuły biurowe > Sortowanie i utrzymanie porządku > Oprawa dokumentów > Bindownice: Bindownice elektryczne; Bindownice ręczne
ja: オフィス用品 > ファイル・バインダー > バインダー・製本用品 > 製本機: 電動製本機; 手動製本機
it: Forniture per ufficio > Archiviazione e organizzazione > Forniture per rilegature > Rilegatrici: Rilegatrici elettriche; Rilegatrici manuali
fi: Toimistotarvikkeet > Arkistointi ja järjestys > Kansiotarvikkeet > Nidontakoneet: Sähköiset nidontakoneet; Manuaaliset nidontakoneet
el: Προμήθειες γραφείου > Αρχειοθέτηση & οργάνωση > Προμήθειες βιβλιοδεσίας > Μηχανές βιβλιοδεσίας: Ηλεκτρικές μηχανές βιβλιοδεσίας; Μη αυτόματες μηχανές βιβλιοδεσίας
zh-CN: 办公用品 > 文件整理 > 装订用品 > 装订机: 电动装订机; 手动装订机
tr: Büro Malzemeleri > Dosyalama ve Organizasyon > Ciltleme Malzemeleri > Ciltleme Makineleri: Elektrikli Ciltleme Makinaları; Manuel Ciltleme Makineleri
ko: 사무용품 > 서류 정리 용품 > 바인더 용품 > 제본기: 전기 제본기; 수동 제본기
bg-BG: Офис консумативи > Картотека и организация > Консумативи за подвързване > Машини за подвързване: Електрически машини за подвързване; Машини за ръчно подвързване
pt-PT: Materiais de escritório > Arquivo e organização > Acessórios de encadernação > Encadernadoras: Encadernadoras elétricas; Encadernadoras manuais
vi: Văn phòng phẩm > Kẹp tài liệu và ngăn chia tài liệu > Kẹp tài liệu > Máy đóng gáy: Máy đóng gáy điện; Máy đóng gáy thủ công
zh-TW: 辦公室用品 > 收納整理用品 > 裝訂用品 > 包紮機: 電動包紮機; 手動包紮機
de: Bürobedarf > Ablage & Organisation > Bindesysteme > Bindegeräte: Elektrische Bindegeräte; Manuelle Bindegeräte
sl-SI: Pisarniški material > Zlaganje in urejanje dokumentov > Potrebščine za vezavo > Stroji za vezavo: Električni stroji za vezavo; Ročni stroji za vezavo
nb: Kontormateriell > Arkivering og organisering > Ringpermutstyr > Bokbindermaskiner: Elektriske innbindingsmaskiner; Manuelle innbindingsmaskiner
sk-SK: Kancelárske potreby > Kartotéka a organizácia > Viazacie potreby > Viazacie stroje: Elektrické viazacie stroje; Ručné viazacie stroje
nl: Kantoorartikelen > Archiveren en indelen > Benodigdheden voor inbinden > Bindmachines: Elektrische bindmachines; Handmatige bindmachines
sv: Kontorsmaterial > Arkiv och organisering > Pärmmaterial > Inbindningsmaskiner: Elektriska inbindningsmaskiner; Manuella inbindningsmaskiner
hr-HR: Uredski materijal > Pohrana i organizacija > Pribor za uvez > Strojevi za uvezivanje: Strojevi za električno uvezivanje; Strojevi za ručno uvezivanje
fr: Fournitures de bureau > Classement et organisation > Matériel de reliure > Machines à relier: Machines à relier électriques; Machines à relier manuelles
pt-BR: Materiais de escritório > Arquivamento e organização > Suprimentos para encadernação > Máquinas de encadernação: Máquinas de encadernação elétricas; Máquinas de encadernação manuais
ru: Товары для офиса и канцтовары > Органайзеры и товары для хранения документов > Товары для брошюровки > Брошюровщики: Электрические брошюровщики; Ручные брошюровщики
ro-RO: Consumabile de birou > Clasare și organizare > Materiale pentru legat > Mașini de legat: Mașini electrice de legat; Mașini manuale de legat
lt-LT: Biuro reikmenys > Bylų saugojimas ir tvarkymas > Įrišimo reikmenys > Įrišimo mašinos: Elektrinės įrišimo mašinos; Rankinės įrišimo mašinos
hu: Irodai kellékek > Tárolás és rendezés > Kötőkellékek > Kötőgépek: Elektromos kötőgépek; Kézi kötőgépek
da: Kontorforsyning > Arkivering og organisering > Indbinding – tilbehør > Indbindingsmaskiner: Elektriske indbindingsmaskiner; Manuelle indbindingsmaskiner
en: Office Supplies > Filing & Organization > Binding Supplies > Binding Machines: Electric Binding Machines; Manual Binding Machines
th: อุปกรณ์สำนักงาน > การจัดเก็บเอกสารและการจัดระเบียบ > อุปกรณ์เข้าเล่ม > เครื่องเย็บเล่ม: เครื่องเย็บเล่มไฟฟ้า; เครื่องเย็บเล่มด้วยมือ
cs: Kancelářské potřeby > Třídění a uspořádání dokumentů > Vázací potřeby > Vazbovače: Elektrické vazbovače; Ruční vazbovače